src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/V-6-wangkwe_gt-norm.yaml
#Past participle, dual object
    ва̄ӈкве+V+PrfPrc+ScSg1+OcDu: ва̄магум
    ва̄ӈкве+V+PrfPrc+ScSg2+OcDu: ва̄магын
    ва̄ӈкве+V+PrfPrc+ScSg3+OcDu: ва̄маге
    ва̄ӈкве+V+PrfPrc+ScDu1+OcDu: [ва̄магаме̄н, ва̄магагме̄н]
    ва̄ӈкве+V+PrfPrc+ScDu2+OcDu: [ва̄магы̄н, ва̄магагы̄н]
    ва̄ӈкве+V+PrfPrc+ScDu3+OcDu: [ва̄магы̄г, ва̄магагы̄г]
    ва̄ӈкве+V+PrfPrc+ScPl1+OcDu: [ва̄магув, ва̄мвгӯв]
    ва̄ӈкве+V+PrfPrc+ScPl2+OcDu: [ва̄магы̄н, ва̄магагы̄н]
    ва̄ӈкве+V+PrfPrc+ScPl3+OcDu: [ва̄магагыл, ва̄магаганыл]

#Past participle, plural object
    ва̄ӈкве+V+PrfPrc+ScSg1+OcPl: [ва̄манум, ва̄мананум]
    ва̄ӈкве+V+PrfPrc+ScSg2+OcPl: [ва̄ман, ва̄ма̄нын]
    ва̄ӈкве+V+PrfPrc+ScSg3+OcPl: [ва̄ма̄нэ, ва̄мана̄нэ]
    ва̄ӈкве+V+PrfPrc+ScDu1+OcPl: [ва̄манаме̄н, ва̄мананме̄н]
    ва̄ӈкве+V+PrfPrc+ScDu2+OcPl: [ва̄манн, ва̄маны̄н, ва̄мананы̄н]
    ва̄ӈкве+V+PrfPrc+ScDu3+OcPl: [ва̄манэ̄н, ва̄мананэ̄н]
    ва̄ӈкве+V+PrfPrc+ScPl1+OcPl: [ва̄манув, ва̄манӯв, ва̄мананув, ва̄мананӯв]
    ва̄ӈкве+V+PrfPrc+ScPl2+OcPl: [ва̄маны̄н, ва̄мананы̄н]
    ва̄ӈкве+V+PrfPrc+ScPl3+OcPl: [ва̄ма̄ныл, ва̄мана̄ныл]

#Gerund
    ва̄ӈкве+V+Ger+OcPl: ва̄им
    ва̄ӈкве+V+Ger+PxSg1: ва̄имам
    ва̄ӈкве+V+Ger+PxSg2: ва̄иман
    ва̄ӈкве+V+Ger+PxSg3: [ва̄има, ва̄иматэ]
    ва̄ӈкве+V+Ger+PxDu1: ва̄имаме̄н
    ва̄ӈкве+V+Ger+PxDu2: ва̄иман
    ва̄ӈкве+V+Ger+PxDu3: ва̄имаг
    ва̄ӈкве+V+Ger+PxPl1: ва̄имав
    ва̄ӈкве+V+Ger+PxPl2: ва̄иман
    ва̄ӈкве+V+Ger+PxPl3: ва̄имат

#Privative
    ва̄ӈкве+V+VAbess: ва̄гтал
